Utah statutes.
57-17-5.   Failure to give renter required notice -- Recovery of deposit, penalty and costs.

If the owner of a residential unit or his agent in bad faith fails within 30 days after termination of the tenancy or within 15 days after receipt of the renter's new mailing address, whichever is later, to provide the renter the notice required in Section 57-17-3, the renter may recover the full deposit, a civil penalty of $100, and court costs. Receipt of new address must occur within 30 days of termination of tenancy.



Enacted by Chapter 208, 1983 General Session

